Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-685
Misdemeanor or traffic infraction; lawful complaints.

When a person has been charged with any act declared to be a misdemeanor or traffic infraction by the Motor Vehicle Operator's License Act, the Motor Vehicle Registration Act, the Motor Vehicle Safety Responsibility Act, or the Nebraska Rules of the Road, and is issued a citation meeting the requirements prescribed by the Supreme Court, if such citation includes the information and is sworn to as required by the laws of this state, then such citation when filed with a court having jurisdiction shall be deemed a lawful complaint for the purpose of prosecution.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 107;

Laws 1974, LB 829, § 10;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-6,107;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 181;

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 239.

Motor Vehicle Operator's License Act, see section 60-462.

Motor Vehicle Registration Act, see section 60-301.

Motor Vehicle Safety Responsibility Act, see section 60-569.